Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Custody disputes involving military parents, §

19-9-3

.

38-1-1.
Marital, birth, divorce, or death records supplied free to veterans, dependents, Department of Veterans Affairs, or veterans’ organizations; requirements; county to pay certain fees.

Any agency of this state or any county official obligated to provide copies or other evidence of the marital, birth, divorce, or death status of persons of this state shall furnish veterans, dependents of deceased veterans, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or any veterans’ organization such copies or other evidence free of charge upon the following conditions:

Where such copies or other evidence is to be used in proceedings for establishing disability or death claims with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; and

Where the request is made in writing by a veteran, a dependent of a deceased veteran, the legal representative of a veteran, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or any veterans’ organization.

In any county where the county official referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section is on a fee basis, the official shall be paid the fee for the service by the county. Payments shall be made on a monthly basis from county funds.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 117, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1956, p. 614, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1.

Cross references.

Vital records generally, T. 31, C. 10.

38-1-2.
Political subdivisions authorized to furnish quarters, utilities, and services to nationally recognized veterans’ organizations.

Subject to the direction of the public officer or authority in charge of a building, office, or meeting hall, political subdivisions of this state are authorized to furnish free of charge a building, office, and meeting hall for the exclusive use of the several nationally recognized veterans’ organizations and their auxiliaries. The several nationally recognized veterans’ organizations may have access at all times to such building, office, or meeting hall. Political subdivisions also have the right to furnish heat, light, utilities, furniture, and janitorial service at no cost to the veterans’ organizations and their auxiliaries.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1181, § 1.